lib/_hunspell/tests/alias.aff
# SPDX-License-Identifier: BSD-3-Clause
# SPDX-FileCopyrightText: 2019 M. Shulhan <ms@kilabit.info>
# aliases for flag vectors (AF)
# AB -> 1
# A -> 2
AF 2
AF AB
AF A

SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 x .

SFX B Y 1
SFX B 0 y/2 .
